Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1219
Administrator;
biennial report; copies; furnish.

The administrator
shall prepare a biennial report on the status of programs established by the
administrator as provided in the Records Management Act and on the progress
made during the preceding biennium in implementing and effectuating such programs
and in reducing costs. Copies of this report shall be furnished to the Governor,
the Clerk of the Legislature,
and such other officials and state and local agencies as the Governor or the
board shall direct. The report submitted to the Clerk of
the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 19, p. 1394;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 26;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 231;

Laws 2012, LB880, § 8;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 45.